Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.755

Advertising—Names used—Penalty.

(1) Any advertisement or announcement for dental services must include for each office location advertised the names of all persons practicing dentistry at that office location.

(2) Any violation of this section is improper, unprofessional, and dishonorable conduct, and grounds for injunction proceedings as provided by RCW 18.130.190(4).

(3) A violation of this section is also a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 126; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 225; 1986 c 259 s 37; 1957 c 52 s 39. Prior: 1937 c 45 s 1, part; 1935 c 112 s 18, part; RRS s 10031-18, part. Formerly RCW 18.32.360.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Savings—1986 c 259 ss 36, 37, 41, 43: See note following RCW 18.32.665.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.